Utah statutes.
77-32-305.   Expenses of printing briefs, depositions, and transcripts.

The state, county, or municipal agency that prosecuted the indigent at trial is responsible for the expenses of printing or typewriting briefs on any first appeal of right, including expenses of depositions and other transcripts.

